Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 47 Aircraft Repair Liens

34-47-1.
Storage and liens.

Persons, including, but not limited to, the state government and any of its departments, commissions, divisions, agencies or branches thereof, maintaining public landing, parking, storage, and tie-down facilities for the landing, parking, storage, and tie-down of aircraft brought to their premises on an airport or placed in their care by or with the consent of the owners thereof, shall have a lien upon such aircraft for proper charges due them for the landing, parking, storage, and tie-down and care of the same.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 356, § 1.

34-47-2.
Repair liens.

Any person who lawfully repairs an aircraft within this state has a lien upon the aircraft for proper charges due to him, made with the consent of the owners of the aircraft.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 356, § 1.

34-47-3.
Procedure.

Any person entitled to a lien under this section shall, within sixty (60) days after last furnishing of labor, money, material, or supplies for the production of, altering, or repairing of the personal property, file in the office of the federal aviation administration aircraft registry a statement in writing verified by oath showing the amount of labor, money, material, or supplies furnished for the producing, storage, parking, servicing, altering, or repairing of the personal property, the name of the person for, and by whom labor, money, material, or supplies, was furnished, and specifying the registration number of the aircraft. Unless the person entitled to the lien files the statement within the time provided in this section, he or she is deemed to have waived his or her rights to the lien; provided, however, that the lien provided for in this section does not attach to any personal property after it has been purchased by an innocent purchaser for value, and has passed into his or her possession, unless the lien has been filed with the federal aviation administration aircraft registry before the property was purchased by the purchaser, or he or she has received written notice, from the party entitled to the lien, of his or her intention to file the lien.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 356, § 1.

34-47-4.
Remedies reserved.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

34-47-3

, whoever has a lien for money due him or her pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is entitled to enforce the lien pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35 of this title. The lien created by this chapter is in addition to any lien created by contract. Any contractual lien may be enforced by the same procedure as is provided in this chapter for the statutory lien, insofar as the contract does not provide otherwise. Any lien created by this chapter does not take priority over any and all prior liens which have been duly recorded and perfected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 356, § 1.